Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201417-313
Village; organize as city of second
class; petition; election.

(1)
The registered voters of a village may vote to discontinue organization as
a village and organize as a city of the second class under this section if
the population of the village exceeds eight hundred inhabitants and the prior
vote pursuant to section 17-312 was in favor of retaining the village form
of government. The issue may be placed before the voters by a resolution adopted
by the board of trustees of the village or by petition signed by one-fourth
of the registered voters of the village.

(2) The petitions shall
conform to section 32-628. The Secretary of State shall design the form to
be used for the petitions. Petition signers and petition circulators shall
conform to the requirements of sections 32-629 and 32-630. The board of trustees
shall submit the petitions to the election commissioner or county clerk for
signature verification pursuant to section 32-631. The required number of
signatures shall be one-fourth of the number of voters registered in the village
at the last statewide general election. The election commissioner or county
clerk shall notify the board of trustees within thirty days after receiving
the petitions from the board of trustees whether the required number of signatures
has been gathered. The village shall reimburse the county for any costs incurred
by the election commissioner or county clerk.

(3) If the board of trustees determines
that the petitions are in proper form and signed by the necessary number of
registered voters or after adoption of the resolution by the board of trustees,
the board of trustees shall submit the question to the voters of whether to
organize as a city of the second class at a special election pursuant to section
32-559 or at the same time as a local or statewide primary or general election
held in the village. The form of the ballot at such election shall be For
reorganization of the Village of ......... as a city of the second class and
Against reorganization of the Village of ........ as a city of the second
class.

(4)
If the majority of the votes cast are for reorganization as a city of the
second class, the board of trustees shall certify such fact to the Secretary
of State who, upon the filing of such a certificate, shall by proclamation
declare such village to have become a city of the second class. Thereafter
such village is a city of the second class, and such city shall be governed
under the laws of this state applicable to cities of the second class. The
government of such city shall continue as organized at the date of such proclamation
until the reorganization as a city of the second class.

(5) Upon such proclamation,
the governing body of the city shall call a special election for the purpose
of electing new members of the city's governing body to be held not more than
eight months after the proclamation is issued. At the initial election of
officers, the names of the candidates receiving the greatest number of votes
at the primary election if one is held shall be placed on the general election
ballot. One-half or the bare majority of the candidates in each precinct or
ward or at-large candidates, as the case may be, receiving the greatest number
of votes at the general election, shall be elected to terms of the longest
duration, and those receiving the next greatest number of votes shall be elected
to the remaining term or terms. Thereafter all members shall be nominated
at the statewide primary election and elected at the statewide general election
for four-year terms as provided in section 32-533. The members of the board
of trustees shall hold office only until the newly elected city officials
assume office.

(6)
All ordinances, bylaws, acts, rules, regulations, obligations, and proclamations
existing and in force in or with respect to any village at the time of its
incorporation as a city of the second class shall remain in full force and
effect after such incorporation as a city of the second class until repealed
or modified by such city within one year after the date of the filing of the
certificate pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

Laws 2014, LB702, § 6.
April 11, 2014